Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MACPHAIL CENTER FOR MUSIC.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin MacPhail Center for Music. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to the MacPhail Center for Music to expand the Learning with Music program: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 250,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 250,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The grant recipient must use grant money received under this section to: new text end new text begin (1) create and deliver professional development training opportunities to early childhood educators statewide, both online and in person, that are based on the research-backed successful elements of the Learning with Music program; and new text end new text begin (2) deepen direct programming to five early childhood center locations to serve as the model for program expansion, with a focus on meeting the needs of children experiencing economic hardship in the Twin Cities metropolitan area. new text end